en: Turkey fillets
bg: Пуешко филе
de: Truthahn-Filet, Putenfilet
fi: Kalkkunafileet
fr: Filets de dinde
hr: Pureći fileti
nl: Kalkoenfilets

en: Frozen turkey fillets
fr: Filets de dinde surgelés

en: Prepared meats, processed meats, Cured meat and sausages
ca: Carns preparades, processades
da: Tilberedt kød
de: Zubereitetes Fleisch, verarbeitetes Fleisch
es: Embutidos, Fiambre
fi: Prosessoidut lihat
fr: Charcuteries, Charcuterie
he: בשר מעובד
hr: Pripremljeno meso
hu: Feldolgozott húsok
it: Carni preparate
ja: 加工品
nl: Verwerkte vleesproducten, Verwerkte vleeswaren
pl: Mięsa przetworzone
pt: Carnes preparadas, carnes processadas
ru: Предварительно обработанные блюда
tr: İşlenmiş etler, Hazır etler
zh: 预制肉类

en: Prepared beef meats
fr: Charcuteries de bœuf

en: Prepared pork meats
fr: Charcuteries de porc

en: Prepared poultry meats
fr: Charcuteries de volaille

en: Prepared chicken meats
fr: Charcuteries de poulet

en: Prepared turkey meats
fr: Charcuteries de dinde

en: Chitterling sausage
fr: Andouilles

en: Chitterling sausage from Vire
fr: Andouilles de Vire, Andouille de Vire

en: Chitterling sausage from Guéméné
fr: Andouilles de Guémené, Andouille de Guémené

en: Pan-reheated chitterling sausage
fr: Andouille réchauffée à la poêle

en: Sautéed chitterling sausage, Pan-fried chitterling sausage
fr: Andouillette sautée, Andouillette poêlée

de: Fleischkäse, Leberkäse
xx: Fleischkäse, Leberkäse

de: Bierschinken
xx: Bierschinken

en: Kasseler, Kassler
xx: Kasseler, Kassler
de: Kasseler, Kassler

en: Cooked kasseler
de: Gekochtes Kasseler

en: Raw kasseler
de: Rohes Kasseler

en: Porchetta
es: Porchetta
fr: Porchetta
hr: Porchetta
it: Porchetta
ja: ポルケッタ

en: Beef pastrami
fr: Pastrami de bœuf
hr: Goveđa pastrama
ja: パストラミ
nl: Rundvleespastrami